California statutes. Penal Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26587.

Section 26500 does not apply to either of the following:

(a) A loan of a firearm to a gunsmith for service or repair.

(b) The return of the firearm by the gunsmith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26588.

Section 26500 does not apply to any of the following:

(a) The sale, delivery, transfer, or return of a firearm regulated pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of that chapter, if the sale, delivery, transfer, or return is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(b) The sale, delivery, transfer, or return of a firearm regulated pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 31005, if the sale, delivery, transfer, or
 return is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(c) The sale, delivery, transfer, or return of a firearm regulated pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 32610) of Division 10 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 32650, if the sale, delivery, transfer, or return is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(d) The sale, delivery, transfer, or return of a firearm regulated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 33300) of Chapter 8 of Division 10 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 33300, if the sale, delivery, transfer, or return is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26589.

Section 26500 does not apply to the delivery or transfer of a firearm to a dealer by the trustee of a trust if the delivery or transfer satisfies both of the following conditions:

(a) The trust is not of the type described in either subdivision (k) or (p) of Section 16990.

(b) The trustee is acting within the course and scope of their duties as the trustee of that trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 110, Sec. 7.   (AB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26590.

Section 26500 does not apply to deliveries, transfers, or returns of firearms made by a court or a law enforcement agency pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exceptions Relating to Law Enforcement [26600. - 26625.]

26600.

(a) Section 26500 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to an authorized law enforcement representative of any city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, for exclusive use by that governmental agency if, prior to the sale, delivery, or transfer of these firearms, written authorization from the head of the agency authorizing the transaction is presented to the person from whom the purchase, delivery, or transfer is being made.

(b) Proper written authorization is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the employee as an individual authorized to conduct the transaction, and
 authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency by which that person is employed.

(c) Within 10 days of the date a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is acquired by the agency, a record of the same shall be entered as an institutional weapon into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 4.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26605.

Section 26500 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The loan is made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, or city and county, or of the state or federal government.

(b) The loan is made to a peace officer employed by that agency and authorized to carry a firearm.

(c) The loan is made for the carrying and use of that firearm by that peace officer in the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26610.

(a) Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a peace officer pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code to that peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold, delivered, or
 transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 5.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26613.

Section 26500 does not apply to the delivery of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a dealer in order for that dealer to deliver the firearm to the spouse or domestic partner of a peace officer who died in the line of duty if the sale of that firearm to the spouse or domestic partner is made in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 16, Sec. 1.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

26615.

(a) Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a retiring peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 5.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred to that retiring peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold,
 delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 6.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26620.

Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm when made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, city and county, or of the state or federal government, if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made to one of the following:

(1) A person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(2) A wholesaler.

(3) A manufacturer or importer of firearms or ammunition licensed to engage in that business
 pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(b) The sale, delivery, or transfer of the firearm is not subject to the procedures set forth in Section 18000, 18005, 34000, or 34005.

(c) If the authorized law enforcement representative sells, delivers, or transfers a firearm that the governmental agency owns to a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, within 10 days of the date that the firearm is delivered to that licensee pursuant to this section by that agency, the agency has entered a record of the delivery into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS). Any agency without access to the AFS
 shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 738, Sec. 3.   (AB 538)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

26625.

Section 26500 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if the loan of the firearm is to a person enrolled in the course of basic training prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, or any other course certified by the commission, for purposes of participation in the course.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   (AB 693)   Effective October 14, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Issuance, Forfeiture, and Conditions of License to Sell, Lease, or Transfer Firearms at Retail [26700. - 27140.]



  ARTICLE 1. License to Sell, Lease, or Transfer Firearms at Retail [26700. - 26725.]

26700.

As used in this division, and in any other provision listed in Section 16580, “dealer,” “licensee,” or “person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive” means a person who satisfies all of the following requirements:

(a) Has a valid federal firearms license.

(b) Has any regulatory or business license, or licenses, required by local government.

(c) Has a valid seller’s permit issued by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant
 to Section 6067 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and, commencing July 1, 2024, has a valid certificate of registration issued pursuant to Section 36036 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(d) Has a certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 26710.

(e) Has a license issued in the format prescribed by subdivision (c) of Section 26705.

(f) Is among those recorded in the centralized list specified in Section 26715.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 3.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26705.

(a) The duly constituted licensing authority of a city, county, or a city and county shall accept applications for, and may grant licenses permitting, licensees to sell firearms at retail within the city, county, or city and county. The duly constituted licensing authority shall inform applicants who are denied licenses of the reasons for the denial in writing.

(b) No license shall be granted to any applicant who fails to provide a copy of
 each of the following documents:

(1) A valid federal firearms license.

(2) A valid seller’s permit issued by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to Section 6067 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and, commencing July 1, 2024, a valid certificate of registration issued pursuant to Section 36036 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) A certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 26710.

(c) A license granted by the duly constituted licensing authority of any city, county, or city and county, shall be valid for not more than one year from the date of issuance and shall be in one of the following forms:

(1) In the form prescribed by the Attorney General.

(2) A regulatory or business license that states on its face “Valid for Retail Sales of Firearms” and is endorsed by the signature of the issuing authority.

(3) A letter from the duly constituted licensing authority having primary jurisdiction for the applicant’s intended business location stating that the jurisdiction does not require any form of regulatory or business license or does not otherwise restrict or regulate the sale of firearms.

(d) Local licensing authorities may assess fees to recover their full costs of processing applications for licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 4.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26710.

(a) A person may request a certificate of eligibility from the Department of Justice.

(b) The Department of Justice shall examine its records and records available to the department in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System in order to determine if the applicant is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(c) The department shall issue a certificate to an applicant if the department’s records indicate that the applicant is not a person who is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing firearms.

(d) The department shall adopt regulations to administer the certificate of eligibility program and shall recover the full costs of administering the program by imposing fees assessed to applicants who apply for those certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26715.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (b), the Department of Justice shall keep a centralized list of all persons licensed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 26700.

(b) (1) The department may remove from this list any person who knowingly or with gross negligence violates a provision listed in Section 16575.

(2) The department shall remove from the centralized list any person whose federal firearms license has expired or has been revoked.

(3) The department shall remove
 from the centralized list any person or entity who has failed to provide certification of compliance with Section 26806 pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 26806.

(4) Upon removal of a dealer from this list, notification shall be provided to local law enforcement and licensing authorities in the jurisdiction where the dealer’s business is located.

(c) Information compiled from the list shall be made available, upon request, for the following purposes only:

(1) For law enforcement purposes.

(2) When the information is requested by a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code for determining the validity of the license for firearm shipments.

(3) When information is requested by a person promoting, sponsoring, operating, or otherwise organizing a show or event as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor, who possesses a valid certificate of eligibility issued pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200) of Chapter 3, if that information is requested by the person to determine the eligibility of a prospective participant in a gun show or event to conduct transactions as a firearms dealer pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 26805.

(d) Information provided pursuant to subdivision (c)
 shall be limited to information necessary to corroborate an individual’s current license status as being one of the following:

(1) A person licensed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 26700.

(2) A person who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code, and who is not subject to the requirement of being licensed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 26700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 995, Sec. 1.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26720.

(a) The Department of Justice may conduct inspections of dealers at least every three years to ensure compliance with the requirements of this title, including any regulations promulgated to implement this title, Sections 21628.2, 21636, and 21640 of the Business and Professions Code, and any other applicable state law.

(1) Commencing on January 1, 2024, the department shall conduct inspections of all dealers, except a dealer specified in subdivision (c), at least once every three years, to ensure compliance with the requirements of this title, including any regulations promulgated to implement this title, Sections 21628.2, 21636, and 21640 of the Business and Professions Code,
 and any other applicable state law.

(2) Inspections of dealers pursuant to this subdivision shall include an audit of dealer records that includes a sampling of at least 25 percent but no more than 50 percent of each record type.

(b) The department may assess an annual fee, not to exceed one hundred fifteen dollars ($115), to cover the reasonable cost of maintaining the list described in Section 26715, including the cost of inspections.

(c) A dealer whose place of business is located in a jurisdiction that has adopted an inspection program to ensure compliance with firearms law is exempt from that portion of the department’s fee that relates to the cost of inspections. The applicant is responsible for providing
 evidence to the department that the jurisdiction in which the business is located has the inspection program. The department may inspect a dealer who is exempt from mandatory inspections under subdivision (b) to ensure compliance with the requirements of this title, including any regulations promulgated to implement this title, Sections 21628.2, 21636, and 21640 of the Business and Professions Code, and any other applicable state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (AB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26725.

The Department of Justice shall maintain and make available upon request information concerning all of the following:

(a) The number of inspections conducted and the amount of fees collected pursuant to Section 26720.

(b) A listing of exempted jurisdictions, as defined in Section 26720.

(c) The number of dealers removed from the centralized list defined in Section 26715.

(d) The number of dealers found to have violated a provision listed in Section 16575 and any other applicable state law with knowledge or gross
 negligence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 245, Sec. 2.   (AB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Grounds for Forfeiture of License [26800. - 26920.]

26800.

(a) A license under this chapter is subject to forfeiture for a violation of any of the prohibitions and requirements of this article, except those stated in the following provisions:

(1) Subdivision (c) of Section 26890.

(2) Subdivision (d) of Section 26890.

(3) Subdivision (b) of Section 26900.

(b) The department may assess a civil fine against a licensee, in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), for any breach of a prohibition or requirement of this title, including any regulations
 promulgated to implement this title, Sections 21628.2, 21636, and 21640 of the Business and Professions Code, and any other applicable state law. The department may assess a civil fine, in an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000), for a violation of a prohibition or requirement of this article that subjects the license to forfeiture under subdivision (a), for either of the following:

(1) The licensee has received written notification from the department regarding the violation and subsequently failed to take corrective action in a timely manner.

(2) The licensee is otherwise determined by the department to have knowingly or with gross negligence violated the prohibition or requirement.

(c) The
 department may adopt regulations setting fine amounts and providing a process for a licensee to appeal a fine assessed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Moneys received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account of the General Fund, to be available, upon appropriation, for expenditure by the department to offset the reasonable costs of firearms-related regulatory and enforcement activities related to the sale, purchase, manufacturing, lawful or unlawful possession, loan, or transfer of firearms pursuant to any provision listed in Section 16580.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 245, Sec. 3.   (AB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26805.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the business of a licensee shall be conducted only in the buildings designated in the license.

(b) (1) A person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 and 26705 may take possession of firearms and commence preparation of registers for the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms at any gun show or event, as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor, if the gun show or event is not conducted from any motorized or towed vehicle. A person conducting business pursuant to this subdivision shall be entitled to conduct business as authorized herein at any gun show or event in the state, without regard to the jurisdiction within this state that issued the
 license pursuant to Sections 26700 and 26705, provided the person complies with all applicable laws, including, but not limited to, the waiting period specified in subdivision (a) of Section 26815, and all applicable local laws, regulations, and fees, if any.

(2) A person conducting business pursuant to this subdivision shall publicly display the person’s license issued pursuant to Sections 26700 and 26705, or a facsimile thereof, at any gun show or event, as specified in this subdivision.

(c) (1) A person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 and 26705 may engage in the sale and transfer of firearms other than handguns, at events specified in Sections 27900 and 27905, subject to the prohibitions and restrictions contained in those sections.

(2) A person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 and
 26705 may also accept delivery of firearms other than handguns, outside the building designated in the license, provided the firearm is being donated for the purpose of sale or transfer at an auction, raffle, or similar event specified in Section 27900.

(d) The firearm may be delivered to the purchaser, transferee, or person being loaned the firearm at one of the following places:

(1) The building designated in the license.

(2) The places specified in subdivision (b) or (c).

(3) The place of residence of, the fixed place of business of, or on private property owned or lawfully possessed by, the purchaser, transferee, or person being loaned the firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 16.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26806.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2024, a licensee shall ensure that its business premises are monitored by a digital video surveillance system that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The system shall clearly record images and, for systems located inside the premises, audio, of the area under surveillance.

(2) Each camera shall be permanently mounted in a fixed location. Cameras shall be placed in locations that allow the camera to clearly record activity occurring in all areas described in paragraph (3) and reasonably produce recordings that allow for the clear identification of any person.

(3) The areas recorded shall include, without limitation, all of the following:

(A) Interior views of all entries or exits to the premises.

(B) All areas where firearms are displayed.

(C) All points of sale, sufficient to identify the parties involved in the transaction.

(4) The system shall continuously record 24 hours per day at a
 frame rate no less than 15 frames per second.

(5) The media or device on which recordings are stored shall be secured in a manner to protect the recording from tampering, unauthorized access or use, or theft.

(6) Recordings shall be maintained for a minimum of one year.

(7) Recorded images shall clearly and accurately display the date and time.

(8) The system shall be equipped with a failure notification system that provides notification to the licensee of any interruption or failure of the system or storage device.

(b) A licensee shall not use, share, allow access, or otherwise
 release recordings, to any person except as follows:

(1) A licensee shall allow access to the system to an agent of the department or a licensing authority conducting an inspection of the licensee’s premises, for the purpose of inspecting the system for compliance with this section, and only if a warrant or court order would not generally be required for that access.

(2) A licensee shall allow access to the system or release recordings to any person pursuant to search warrant or other court order.

(3) A licensee may allow access to the system or release recordings to any person in response to an insurance claim or as part of the civil discovery process, including, but not limited
 to, in response to subpoenas, request for production or inspection, or other court order.

(c) The licensee shall post a sign in a conspicuous place at each entrance to the premises that states in block letters not less than one inch in height:
“THESE PREMISES ARE UNDER VIDEO AND AUDIO SURVEILLANCE. YOUR IMAGE AND CONVERSATIONS MAY BE RECORDED.”
(d) A licensee shall, on an annual basis, provide certification to the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, that its video surveillance system is in proper working order.

(e) This section does not preclude any local authority or local governing
 body from adopting or enforcing local laws or policies regarding video surveillance that do not contradict or conflict with the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 995, Sec. 2.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26810.

A person’s license under this chapter, or a copy thereof certified by the issuing authority, shall be displayed on the premises where it can easily be seen.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26811.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2023, a licensee shall carry a general liability insurance policy providing at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) of coverage per incident.

(b) This section does not preclude any local authority from requiring a more stringent requirement regarding the maintenance of liability insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 995, Sec. 3.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26815.

No firearm shall be delivered:

(a) Within 10 days of the application to purchase, or, after notice by the department pursuant to Section 28220, within 10 days of the submission to the department of any correction to the application, or within 10 days of the submission to the department of any fee required pursuant to Section 28225, whichever is later.

(b) Unless unloaded and securely wrapped or unloaded and in a locked container.

(c) Unless the purchaser, transferee, or person being loaned the firearm presents clear evidence of the person’s identity and age to the dealer.

(d) Whenever the dealer is notified by the Department of Justice that the person is prohibited by state or federal law from processing, owning, purchasing, or receiving a firearm. The dealer shall make available to the person in the prohibited class a prohibited notice and transfer form, provided by the department, stating that the person is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm, and that the person may obtain from the department the reason for the prohibition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26820.

No handgun or imitation handgun, or placard advertising the sale or other transfer thereof, shall be displayed in any part of the premises where it can readily be seen from the outside.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 8.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26825.

A licensee shall agree to and shall act properly and promptly in processing firearms transactions pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26830.

A licensee shall comply with all of the following:

(a) Sections 27500 to 27535, inclusive.

(b) Section 27555.

(c) Section 28100.

(d) Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150) of Chapter 6.

(e) Article 3 (commencing with Section 28200) of Chapter 6.

(f) Section 30300.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26835.

(a) A licensee shall conspicuously post within the licensed premises the following warnings in block letters not less than one inch in height:

(1) “FIREARMS MUST BE HANDLED RESPONSIBLY AND SECURELY STORED TO PREVENT ACCESS BY CHILDREN AND OTHER UNAUTHORIZED USERS. CALIFORNIA HAS STRICT LAWS PERTAINING TO FIREARMS, AND YOU MAY BE FINED OR IMPRISONED IF YOU FAIL TO COMPLY WITH THEM. VISIT THE WEBSITE OF THE CALIFORNIA ATTORNEY GENERAL AT HTTPS://OAG.CA.GOV/FIREARMS FOR INFORMATION ON FIREARM LAWS APPLICABLE TO YOU AND HOW YOU CAN COMPLY.”

(2) “IF YOU KEEP A FIREARM WITHIN ANY PREMISES UNDER YOUR CUSTODY OR CONTROL, AND A PERSON UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE OBTAINS IT AND USES IT, RESULTING IN INJURY OR
 DEATH, OR CARRIES IT TO A PUBLIC PLACE, YOU MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR OR A FELONY UNLESS YOU STORED THE FIREARM IN A LOCKED CONTAINER OR LOCKED THE FIREARM WITH A LOCKING DEVICE TO KEEP IT FROM TEMPORARILY FUNCTIONING.”

(3) “CHILDREN MAY BE UNABLE TO DISTINGUISH FIREARMS FROM TOYS AND MAY OPERATE FIREARMS, CAUSING SEVERE INJURIES OR DEATH. IF YOU KEEP A FIREARM WITHIN ANY PREMISES UNDER YOUR CUSTODY OR CONTROL, AND A PERSON UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE GAINS ACCESS TO THE FIREARM AND CARRIES IT OFF-PREMISES, YOU MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR, UNLESS YOU STORED THE FIREARM IN A LOCKED CONTAINER, OR LOCKED THE FIREARM WITH A LOCKING DEVICE TO KEEP IT FROM TEMPORARILY FUNCTIONING.”

(4) “YOU MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR, INCLUDING A SIGNIFICANT FINE OR IMPRISONMENT, IF YOU KEEP A FIREARM WHERE A MINOR IS LIKELY TO ACCESS IT OR IF A MINOR OBTAINS AND IMPROPERLY USES IT, OR CARRIES IT
 OFF OF THE PREMISES TO A SCHOOL OR SCHOOL-SPONSORED EVENT, UNLESS YOU STORED THE FIREARM IN A LOCKED CONTAINER OR LOCKED THE FIREARM WITH A LOCKING DEVICE.”

(5) “IF YOU NEGLIGENTLY STORE OR LEAVE A FIREARM WITHIN ANY PREMISES UNDER YOUR CUSTODY OR CONTROL WHERE A PERSON UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE IS LIKELY TO ACCESS IT, YOU MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR, INCLUDING A SIGNIFICANT FINE, UNLESS YOU STORED THE FIREARM IN A LOCKED CONTAINER OR LOCKED THE FIREARM WITH A LOCKING DEVICE.”

(6) “DISCHARGING FIREARMS IN POORLY VENTILATED AREAS, CLEANING FIREARMS, OR HANDLING AMMUNITION MAY RESULT IN EXPOSURE TO LEAD, A SUBSTANCE KNOWN TO CAUSE BIRTH DEFECTS, REPRODUCTIVE HARM, AND OTHER SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY. HAVE ADEQUATE VENTILATION AT ALL TIMES. WASH HANDS THOROUGHLY AFTER EXPOSURE.”

(7) “FEDERAL REGULATIONS PROVIDE THAT IF YOU
 DO NOT TAKE PHYSICAL POSSESSION OF THE FIREARM THAT YOU ARE ACQUIRING OWNERSHIP OF WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER YOU COMPLETE THE INITIAL BACKGROUND CHECK PAPERWORK, THEN YOU HAVE TO GO THROUGH THE BACKGROUND CHECK PROCESS A SECOND TIME IN ORDER TO TAKE PHYSICAL POSSESSION OF THAT FIREARM.”

(8) “NO PERSON SHALL MAKE AN APPLICATION TO PURCHASE MORE THAN ONE FIREARM WITHIN ANY 30-DAY PERIOD AND NO DELIVERY SHALL BE MADE TO ANY PERSON WHO HAS MADE AN APPLICATION TO PURCHASE MORE THAN ONE FIREARM WITHIN ANY 30-DAY PERIOD.”

(9) “IF A FIREARM YOU OWN OR POSSESS IS LOST OR STOLEN, YOU MUST REPORT THE LOSS OR THEFT TO A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WHERE THE LOSS OR THEFT OCCURRED WITHIN FIVE DAYS OF THE TIME YOU KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE FIREARM HAD BEEN LOST OR STOLEN.”

(b) (1) In addition
 to the notice required by subdivision (a), a licensee shall post conspicuously within the licensed premises, on a contrasting background and written in block letters not less than one inch in height, an additional notice containing the following statement:

“WARNING:

IF YOU OR A LOVED ONE IS EXPERIENCING DISTRESS OR DEPRESSION OR IS CONTEMPLATING SUICIDE, PLEASE CALL 988 (THE 988 SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE).

ACCESS TO A FIREARM IN THE HOME SIGNIFICANTLY INCREASES THE RISK OF SUICIDE, DEATH, AND INJURY DURING DOMESTIC VIOLENCE DISPUTES, AND THE UNINTENTIONAL DEATH AND TRAUMATIC INJURY TO CHILDREN, HOUSEHOLD MEMBERS, AND GUESTS.”

(2) The statement in paragraph (1) shall be posted on the counter of one of the main gun displays or within five feet of the cash register. In the case that posting the statement on the counter
 of a gun display or within five feet of the cash register is impossible, the licensed dealer shall post the statement conspicuously within the licensed premises. The statement shall not be placed on the floor or the ceiling of the premises.

(3) The word “WARNING” in paragraph (1) shall be on a separate line above the other text in the statement.

(4) The sentence “IF YOU OR A LOVED ONE IS EXPERIENCING DISTRESS OR DEPRESSION OR IS CONTEMPLATING SUICIDE, PLEASE CALL 988 (THE 988 SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE).” in paragraph (1) shall be on a separate line below “WARNING” and above the other text in the statement.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 13.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative April 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 14 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

26835.

(a) A licensee shall conspicuously post within the licensed premises the following warnings in block letters not less than one inch in height:

(1) “FIREARMS MUST BE HANDLED RESPONSIBLY AND SECURELY STORED TO PREVENT ACCESS BY CHILDREN AND OTHER UNAUTHORIZED USERS. CALIFORNIA HAS STRICT LAWS PERTAINING TO FIREARMS, AND YOU MAY BE FINED OR IMPRISONED IF YOU FAIL TO COMPLY WITH THEM. VISIT THE WEBSITE OF THE CALIFORNIA ATTORNEY GENERAL AT HTTPS://OAG.CA.GOV/FIREARMS FOR INFORMATION ON FIREARM LAWS APPLICABLE TO YOU AND HOW YOU CAN COMPLY.”

(2) “IF YOU KEEP A FIREARM WITHIN ANY PREMISES UNDER YOUR CUSTODY OR CONTROL, AND A PERSON UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE OBTAINS IT AND USES IT,
 RESULTING IN INJURY OR DEATH, OR CARRIES IT TO A PUBLIC PLACE, YOU MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR OR A FELONY UNLESS YOU STORED THE FIREARM IN A LOCKED CONTAINER OR LOCKED THE FIREARM WITH A LOCKING DEVICE TO KEEP IT FROM TEMPORARILY FUNCTIONING.”

(3) “CHILDREN MAY BE UNABLE TO DISTINGUISH FIREARMS FROM TOYS AND MAY OPERATE FIREARMS, CAUSING SEVERE INJURIES OR DEATH. IF YOU KEEP A FIREARM WITHIN ANY PREMISES UNDER YOUR CUSTODY OR CONTROL, AND A PERSON UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE GAINS ACCESS TO THE FIREARM AND CARRIES IT OFF-PREMISES, YOU MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR, UNLESS YOU STORED THE FIREARM IN A LOCKED CONTAINER, OR LOCKED THE FIREARM WITH A LOCKING DEVICE TO KEEP IT FROM TEMPORARILY FUNCTIONING.”

(4) “YOU MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR, INCLUDING A SIGNIFICANT FINE OR IMPRISONMENT, IF YOU KEEP A FIREARM WHERE A MINOR IS LIKELY TO ACCESS IT OR IF A MINOR OBTAINS AND IMPROPERLY
 USES IT, OR CARRIES IT OFF OF THE PREMISES TO A SCHOOL OR SCHOOL-SPONSORED EVENT, UNLESS YOU STORED THE FIREARM IN A LOCKED CONTAINER OR LOCKED THE FIREARM WITH A LOCKING DEVICE.”

(5) “IF YOU NEGLIGENTLY STORE OR LEAVE A FIREARM WITHIN ANY PREMISES UNDER YOUR CUSTODY OR CONTROL WHERE A PERSON UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE IS LIKELY TO ACCESS IT, YOU MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR, INCLUDING A SIGNIFICANT FINE, UNLESS YOU STORED THE FIREARM IN A LOCKED CONTAINER OR LOCKED THE FIREARM WITH A LOCKING DEVICE.”

(6) “DISCHARGING FIREARMS IN POORLY VENTILATED AREAS, CLEANING FIREARMS, OR HANDLING AMMUNITION MAY RESULT IN EXPOSURE TO LEAD, A SUBSTANCE KNOWN TO CAUSE BIRTH DEFECTS, REPRODUCTIVE HARM, AND OTHER SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY. HAVE ADEQUATE VENTILATION AT ALL TIMES. WASH HANDS THOROUGHLY AFTER EXPOSURE.”

(7) “FEDERAL
 REGULATIONS PROVIDE THAT IF YOU DO NOT TAKE PHYSICAL POSSESSION OF THE FIREARM THAT YOU ARE ACQUIRING OWNERSHIP OF WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER YOU COMPLETE THE INITIAL BACKGROUND CHECK PAPERWORK, THEN YOU HAVE TO GO THROUGH THE BACKGROUND CHECK PROCESS A SECOND TIME IN ORDER TO TAKE PHYSICAL POSSESSION OF THAT FIREARM.”

(8) “NO PERSON SHALL MAKE AN APPLICATION TO PURCHASE ONE OR MORE FIREARMS THAT WOULD RESULT IN THE PURCHASE OF MORE THAN THREE FIREARMS CUMULATIVELY WITHIN ANY 30-DAY PERIOD AND NO DELIVERY SHALL BE MADE TO ANY PERSON WHO HAS MADE AN APPLICATION TO PURCHASE ONE OR MORE FIREARMS THAT WOULD RESULT IN THE PURCHASE OF MORE THAN THREE FIREARMS CUMULATIVELY WITHIN THE 30-DAY PERIOD PRECEDING THE DATE OF THE APPLICATION, INCLUSIVE.”

(9) “IF A FIREARM YOU OWN OR POSSESS IS LOST OR STOLEN, YOU MUST REPORT THE LOSS OR THEFT TO A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WHERE THE LOSS OR THEFT
 OCCURRED WITHIN FIVE DAYS OF THE TIME YOU KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE FIREARM HAD BEEN LOST OR STOLEN.”

(b) (1) In addition to the notice required by subdivision (a), a licensee shall post conspicuously within the licensed premises, on a contrasting background and written in block letters not less than one inch in height, an additional notice containing the following statement:

“WARNING:

IF YOU OR A LOVED ONE IS EXPERIENCING DISTRESS OR DEPRESSION OR IS CONTEMPLATING SUICIDE, PLEASE CALL 988 (THE 988 SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE).

ACCESS TO A FIREARM IN THE HOME SIGNIFICANTLY INCREASES THE RISK OF SUICIDE, DEATH, AND INJURY DURING DOMESTIC VIOLENCE DISPUTES, AND THE UNINTENTIONAL DEATH AND TRAUMATIC INJURY TO CHILDREN, HOUSEHOLD MEMBERS, AND GUESTS.”
